Utah statutes.
63C-11-304.   Additional fees for license of promoter -- Dedicated credits
-- Promotion of contests -- Annual exemption of showcase event.
(1)  In addition to the payment of any other fees and money due under this
chapter, every promoter shall pay a license fee determined by the commission
and established in rule.
(a)  License fees collected under Subsection (1)(a) from professional boxing
contests or exhibitions shall be retained by the commission as a dedicated
credit to be used by the commission to award grants to organizations that
promote amateur boxing in the state and cover commission expenses.
(b)  Monies available to the commission for awarding grants to organizations
that promote amateur boxing in the state and covering commission expenses are
nonlapsing for fiscal year 2009-10 only.
(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall adopt rules:
(a)  governing the manner in which applications for grants under Subsection
(1) may be submitted to the commission; and
(b)  establishing standards for awarding grants under Subsection (1) to
organizations which promote amateur boxing in the state.
(3) (a)  For the purpose of creating a greater interest in contests in the
state, the commission may exempt from the payment of license fees under this
section one contest or exhibition in each calendar year, intended as a
showcase event.
(b)  The commission shall select the contest or exhibition to be exempted
based on factors which include:
(i)  attraction of the optimum number of spectators;
(ii)  costs of promoting and producing the contest or exhibition;
(iii)  ticket pricing;
(iv)  committed promotions and advertising of the contest or exhibition;
(v)  rankings and quality of the contestants; and
(vi)  committed television and other media coverage of the contest or
exhibition.
